<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88510-0032 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-10-88.f2.A1031</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 90 / Tuesday, May 10, 1988 / ProposedRules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Federal Railroad Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Parts 217 and 219</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRA Docket No. RSOR-6, Notice No. 18]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Railroad Operating Rules; Random Drug Testing Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Railroad Administration (FRA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>FRA proposes a rule to: (1) Prohibit the abuse of controlledsubstances, whether on duty or off duty, by railroad employees who performcovered service, and (2) require that railroads implement random drug urinetesting programs approved by the FRA. These measures are designed to facilitatethe control of drug use in railroad operations and thereby prevent accidents,injuries and property damage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>(1) FRA will hold informal hearings on this proposal attimes and places to be announced in a subsequent notice.(2) Written comments must be received no later than August 8, 1988. Commentsreceived after that date will be considered to the extent possible withoutincurring additional expense or delay.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>(1) Hearing locations will be announced in a subsequentnotice.(2) Written comments should be submitted to the Docket Clerk, Office ofthe Chief Counsel (RCC-30), FRA, Room 8201, 400 7th Street SW., Washington,DC 20590. Persons desiring to be notified that their written comments havebeen received by the FRA should submit a stamped, self-addressed postcardwith their comments. The Docket Clerk will indicate on the postcard thedate on which the comments were received and will return the card to theaddressee. Written comments will be available for examination, both beforeand after the closing date for comments, during regular business hoursin Room 8201 of the Nassif Building at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Walter Rockey, Special Assistantto the Associate Administrator for Safety, FRA, Washington, DC 20590 (Telephone:(202) 366-0897) or Grady Cothen, Special Counsel (Telephone: (202) 366-0628).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Introduction</ITAG>On February 10, 1986, the final rule on Control of Alcohol and Drug Usein Railroad Operations (49 CFR Part 219) became effective. (<T3>See</T3> 51 FR 3973; January 31, 1986.) On and after that date, railroademployees subject to the Hours of Service Act were prohibited from using,possessing, or being impaired by alcohol or any controlled substance whileon duty. The railroads were required to exercise due diligence to preventsuch conduct. Railroads were also authorized to comply with requirementsfor post-accident testing. Additional provisions of the rule became effectiveon February 10, 1986, including an authorization to require breath or urinesamples for testing under conditions constituting ``reasonable cause,''improved accident/incident reporting requirements (49 CFR 225.17, as amended),requirements that the railroads adopt and implement policies to identifyemployees troubled by alcohol and drug abuse problems and provide themthe opportunity to obtain counseling or treatment, and more detailed specificationsfor reporting the results of operational tests and inspections relatedto alcohol and drug use (49 CFR 217.13, as amended).On March 10, 1986, compliance with post-accident testing provisions becamemandatory. Requirements for pre-employment drug screens became mandatoryon May 1, 1986; and, as of that date, the current alcohol and drug regulationswere fully effective in all respects.In the preamble to its current rule, FRA stated its intention to monitorthe experience of the railroads under this rule, including the successof complementary efforts in the private sector to address alcohol and druguse in railroad operations (50 FR 31508, 31567; August 2, 1985). On February18, 1987 FRA held a public hearing to review experience during the firstyear of the rule's application (52 FR 2118; January 20, 1987). The purposeof the inquiry was to solicit and review data on the first year of therule's implementation and, on the basis of that information, determinewhether any revisions to the final rule should be considered.In the near future FRA will issue a separate notice of proposed rulemaking(NPRM) dealing with relatively narrow issues developed in the safety inquiryregarding the operation of the current rule. The present notice proposessignificant additions to the current rule which are beyond the scope ofthat inquiry, but which derive from experience in administration of thecurrent rule since February of 1986.For reasons set forth in the preamble, FRA elected not to incorporate arandom testing requirement in its current rule. However, our experienceover the past two years has convinced us that the current reasonable causetesting program should be supplemented by a random testing mandate.Even as FRA has worked to implement and refine its current program, ithas become apparent that a significant portion of the substance abuse problemremains unaddressed. As a consequence, FRA is proposing to forbid any useof controlled substances by covered employees that is not medically authorizedand to add a random testing program for controlled substances to the existingregulatory program.The success of a reasonable cause testing program_both in detection anddeterrence_depends on the extent to which the drug choice produces noticeablemanifestations of impairment or results in an on-the-job event that fallssquarely within the regulatory criteria for testing. Unfortunately, thesymptoms of drug use are often undetectable by even a reasonably trainedsupervisor. Further, some ``functional'' drug users seem able to avoidjob-related problems until their problems reach a crisis stage. There is,in short, a category of cases in which drug use in violation of the Federalrule will not trigger the testing mechanism provided in current law shortof a major compromise in safety that could have catastrophic consequences.More serious is the fact that some drug users understand the difficultyin perceiving symptoms and remain confident (rightly or wrongly) that theiractions will never trigger testing under the current reasonable cause testingauthority. In fact, one hallmark of chronic drug use is the user's confidencethat he/she can operate normally despite consumption or impairment, a confidencethat limits the otherwise significant deterrent value of a reasonable causetesting program.Finally, a reasonable suspicion rule can be defeated by procedures as simpleas reporting for work unimpaired, then consuming controlled substancesin the workplace. The engineer of the Conrail movement at fault in theChase, Maryland, accident recently testified that use of the reasonablesuspicion standard would not have detected any problem with his behavioron reporting for duty. In that case, the engineer and front brakeman usedmarijuana after departing the terminal.Random testing addresses these problems by ensuring that any member ofthe safety-critical workforce is subject to testing at any time, regardlessof the ability of the individual drug user to cloak the symptoms of useor impairment. Detection is accomplished prior to the time when the safetyrisk associated with drug use becomes manifest in a potentially life-threateningevent.This not to suggest that random testing is a substitute for reasonablecause authority. They are not mutually exclusive, but are in fact complementary.Random testing is both broader and narrower than reasonable cause testing.It is broader because random testing ensures that all carriers must conducta minimum level of testing activity in any given time period. Reasonablecause testing, in contrast, is an authority, not a mandate. The carriercan elect not to exercise that authority or to exercise it at a lesserdegree of intensity than other railroads. In the rail mode, mandating reasonablecause testing for a broad range of individually unpredictable events wouldcreate major logistical problems. By contrast, in the railroad industrymandatory random testing can be centrally planned and administered on amore cost effective basis.Conversely, however, random testing is narrower than reasonable cause testingbecause it does not empower the supervisor to test an employee unless thatemployee's name appears on the random selection list for that test period.<ITAG tagnum="84">Extent of Drug Use Problem</ITAG>In previous rulemaking documents FRA has described the extent of drug useprevalence in society at large and in the railroad industry. Prevalencevaries by a number of demographic factors, but no railroad or part of thecountry is free from this common problem.A recently issued Special Report from the Comptroller General of the UnitedStates entitled ``Controlling Drug Abuse: A Status Report'' (1988 GAO Report)states as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Drug abuse in the United States has persisted at a very high levelthroughout the 1980's. Drug abuse is a serious national problem that adverselyaffects all parts of our society.</ITAG>Drug use in the railroad workplace is a matter of particular concern becauseit affects the public safety, as well as the health and safety of drugusing and non-drug using employees.Experience under FRA's current rule has confirmed the existence of a residualproblem that persists despite the deterrent effect of the current regulatoryprogram, voluntary alcohol/drug prevention activities, and a long historyof substance abuse treatment programs targeted at the railroad employeepopulation.During the period February 10, 1986, through December 31, 1987, mandatorypost-accident testing was conducted after 349 qualifying events. A totalof 1508 employees were tested. Of the 1508, 76 employees (5.0%) testedpositive for alcohol or a controlled substance used without medical authorization(illicit drug use or self-medication). Of the 76 employees, 10 (.7%) testedpositive for alcohol and 66 (4.4%) for a controlled substance. An additional12 employees (.8%) tested positive for prescription drugs.The 4.4 percent positive rate for illicit drugs (and non-authorized useof prescription drugs) is encouraging to a degree, since it is below manyprevious estimates of drug use prevalence, notwithstanding the fact thatdrug users would be expected to be overrepresented in the population sampled(employees involved in accidents). On the other hand, it is also possiblethat the statistic understates general drug use prevalence among railroademployees, since any single-event testing program will capture drug useonly in a very discrete time frame (<T3>e.g., </T3>a non-dependent user may bring drugs into the workplaceonly on certain occasions).Post-accident data indicate that behavior modification has taken placein response to the current rule. However, a 4.4 percent positive figureis not an acceptable figure, as evidenced by the fact that drug use mayhave contributed to the probable cause of several significant accidentssince issuance of the current rule and presents a continuing threat topublic safety.The National Transportation Safety Board recently concluded that the Chase,Maryland, accident of January 4, 1987, was caused by impairment of theConrail engineer by marijuana. The engineer and front brakeman of the Conrailmovement have acknowledged smoking marijuana immediately prior to the accident.Sixteen persons were killed and 174 injured in that accident, which illustratesthe catastrophic consequences that can occur when railroad employees responsiblefor passengers or hazardous materials are under the influence of drugs.During the thirteen-month period January 1987 through January 1988, thenation's railroads experienced 41 accidents (including Chase, Maryland)in which one or more employees tested positive for alcohol or illegal drugs.Alcohol or drug use by one or more employees was detected in over 20% ofqualifying events for post-accident testing. FRA believes that there aresignificant indications that alcohol or drug use played a causal or contributoryrole in 13 of these events, accounting for 19 fatalities, 220 injuriesand $19,956,000 in property damage. Of the 13 events, illicit drug usewas present in 10 and alcohol use in only 3, despite estimates at the timethe current rule was issued that alcohol prevalence and drug use prevalencewere roughly equal. The 10 accidents involving drug positives accountedfor 18 fatalities, 220 injuries, and $18,725,628 in property damage. Thesedata present a stark contrast to the preponderance of alcohol involvementover drug involvement in accident statistics assembled before routine post-accidenttoxicological test results became available.The tentative lessons from the above are twofold: (1) The current rulehas been more effective in limiting alcohol use than drug use; and (2)the drug use problem affecting railroad safety is, as projected at thetime of the issuance of the current rule, a more significant problem thanpreviously documented.<ITAG tagnum="84">Support for New Initiatives</ITAG>Several commenters on the NPRM which preceded the current rule on the Controlof Alcohol and Drug Use in Railroad Operations also advocated the grantof authority for random testing (50 FR 31547; August 2, 1985). These commentersinclude the Association of American Railroads and several major railroads.The Washington Legal Foundation agreed that there was justification fordeferring a decision on random testing when it commented on the NPRM forthe current rule and advocated that the FRA should review the effectivenessof the current rule for one year and reconsider random testing in lightof the results. At the safety inquiry hearing called for first-year reviewof the current rule, several commenters reiterated their support for randomtesting.<ITAG tagnum="84">Effects of Drug Use on Safety</ITAG>This NPRM proposes to prohibit railroad employees in covered service fromusing controlled substances without medical authorization, whether on dutyor off duty. The premise of this proposal is very simple: Use of any controlledsubstance has the potential to degrade safety performance. In order tounderstand this premise, it is necessary to review what controlled substancesare and what effects they have on individual persons.Drugs are chemicals that affect the body (physiological or function-alteringeffects) and often the mind (pharmacological or mind-altering effects).In broad summary, controlled substances are certain drugs identified bythe government as having mind- or function-altering effects of a kind thatcreate a potential for abuse and/or dependency. In comments before theFederal Railroad Administration, the American Medical Association and otherparties have agreed that, as a general matter, controlled substances constitutethe primary drugs of interest (other than alcohol) with respect to transportationsafety.Most controlled substances have at least some accepted medical applications,but those classified in Schedule I of the controlled substances list donot. Therapeutic use of certain controlled substances is frequently indicatedboth from a medical point of view and from the point of view of transportationsafety, since proper use of drugs can control disorders that adverselyaffect performance while permitting the individual to continue productiveemployment. If therapeutic drugs are used at appropriate levels establishedby medical practitioners and care is taken to monitor undesired ``sideeffects,'' safety will not be materially compromised. Indeed, in many cases,control of the underlying disorder will produce net safety benefits.However, when individuals make non-medical use of controlled substances,they often use illegal (``illicit'') drugs that have unacceptable mind-alteringand function-altering characteristics. Similarly, when individuals self-administerlegal (``licit'') drugs for non-medical purposes, or without proper medicalsupervision, adverse effects may result.Drugs and Their EffectsControlled substances are classified by pharmacological properties as_andbullet; Narcotics, such as the opiate-based drugs;andbullet; Central nervous system (CNS) depressants, such as the barbiturates,tranquilizers, and methaqualone;andbullet; CNS stimulants, such as cocaine and amphetamines;andbullet; Hallucinogens, such as LSD and PCP; andandbullet; Cannabis (marijuana derivatives).All controlled substances have a potential for abuse, and many have a highpotential for dependence. The effects of these drugs vary to some extentby dosage, subject, frequency of use, route of ingestion, and pattern ofuse. An individual drug user may be affected differently by the same dosageon different occasions as a result of degree of fatigue, physical disorders,biorhythms, acquired tolerance, and other factors.It is important to note that the effects of drugs on human performanceare not limited to a perceived ``high'' or other immediate mind-alteringsensation experienced by the user. Instead, drug effects are complex and,in many cases, long-lived. They include_andbullet; <T3>Acute </T3>effects, including the often sought-after change of mentalstate and physiological changes;andbullet; <T3>After</T3>-effects from individual doses or series of doses;andbullet; <T3>Chronic </T3>effects from prolonged use, which may include profoundbiochemical changes and changes in cognitive functions; andandbullet; <T3>Withdrawal </T3>effects when a drug-dependent individual ceases useof the drug.All of these potential effects are of concern with respect to transportationsafety, yet only the acute effects correlate in time with body fluid concentrationsof the impairing substance; and for some drugs that correlation is imperfect.Perceived Dangers of Drugs in TransportationThe potential detrimental effects of drugs on performance are not a matterof speculation. There is a broad consensus among transportation companies,employees and related professionals that the use of alcohol and the non-medicaluse of controlled substances are not consistent with safety. Increasingly,knowledgeable safety professionals in transportation are coming to realizethat ``off-duty use'' and ``on-duty use'' are not completely distinct categorieswarranting entirely separate consideration, but are instead facets of anoverall picture_<T3>i.e., </T3>fitness for duty involving safety-sensitive functions. Althoughthere are differences of opinion among transportation safety experts concerningappropriate countermeasures, the need for effective countermeasures isalmost universally acknowledged.Experimental/Clinical DataDeveloping opinion in the transportation industries is informed by a growingbody of information related to drug effects on safety. Numerous behavioralstudies and extensive clincial experience have established the fact thatcontrolled substances can powerfully alter the capacity of human beingsto respond appropriately to their environment.The following discussion will endeavor to explain in summary how drugscan and do adversely affect safety. Since each human being is, from thescientific point of view, a unique and whole organism, any such discussionwill suffer from incompleteness, on the one hand, and an absence of totalanalytical integration, on the other. However, the available literaturedoes offer useful information that can be placed in appropriate contextand that can guide the formulation of public policy. Among other sources,this discussion draws heavily on a draft study prepared by the TransportationSystems Center of the Department of Transportation. A copy of that report(Sussman, Salvatore, Huntley and Hobbs, ``Data Available on the Impactof Drug Use on Transportation Safety,'' April 17, 1987) will be placedin the docket of this rulemaking.Drug effects can be analyzed in experimental studies from the point ofview of their impact on particular human faculties. These faculties are,of course, merely aspects of human performance capabilities, and experimentalstudies often involve tasks that may call on more than one faculty. ``Sensoryfunction'' refers to the ability of an individual to detect, feel, identify,discriminate between, and recognize objects and conditions. Visual acuityand perception are of greatest concern for transportation employees. ``Motorperformance'' concerns the ability to make timely, accurate, and steadycontrol movements. Both simple and complex reaction time, as well as trackingand steadiness, are skills of concern to transporation. ``Vigilance'' isa term used to describe the ability of an individual to detect and respondto extremely infrequent signals provided as a part of a low event or boringtask. Maintaining attention and alertness is important for all transportationoperators, particularly during night operations. ``Cognitive functions''refers to the ability to classify, store, integrate, and recall information.Judgment, memory, proclivity for risk-taking, and ability to manage multipletasks are areas of particular concern for transportation.The clear message from available evidence is that all controlled substancestend, to a greater or lesser degree, to affect adversely one or more ofthe faculties critical to safe conduct of transportation and transportation-relatedduties. In some cases, acute effects may be of greatest concern, whilewith other drugs the primary hazards may relate to after effects and chroniceffects. Some individuals may be unimpaired by some drugs at some dosageswith respect to certain faculties relevant to performance. Indeed, in certaindiscrete settings CNS stimulants may temporarily enhance the ability ofan individual to sustain attention (as an acute effect). However, whenthe full range of effects is considered, no controlled substance can beeliminated as a source of significant concern.<T3>Narcotics</T3> are among the drugs having the highest potential forabuse and dependence, and use of narcotics is therefore unlikely to belimited to off-duty hours. Narcotics dull the perception of external andinternal stimuli and tend to induce a feeling of pleasant lethargy. Thesedrugs can adversely affect motor performance, as well as vigilance. Althoughthere is no extensive body of literature on the effects of narcotics ontasks common to transportation, standard therapeutic practice requireswarning that narcotics should not be used by transportation or heavy equipmentoperators except where side-effects have been determined and then onlyunder strict medical supervision.<T3>CNS depressants</T3> include a variety of compounds that reduce sensitivityto stimuli, slow information processing, and impair the ability of theuser to concentrate or focus attention.Behavorial studies of the acute effects of CNS depressants have demonstrateddecrements to motor performance, including tracking skills, simple reactiontime, and choice reaction time. Depressants may adversely affect sensoryfunctions such as signal recognition and cognitive functions such as short-termmemory and information processing.Experimental evidence also shows that after-effects of depressant use (hangovers)can impair performance. Further, most CNS depressants have a high dependencypotential, and severe withdrawal symptoms can result if use is discontinuedsuddenly. Since the timing of withdrawal symptoms is not always predictable,the cessation of use by a depressant-dependent person can result in lossof control over a transporation vehicle or task. Instances of severe withdrawalfrom alcohol, involving convulsions and loss of control, have been reportedin the aviation context; and withdrawal from other CNS Depressants presentsrisks of equal gravity.<T3>CNS stimulants</T3> such as cocaine and the amphetamines tend to increasemental activity, responsiveness to external stimuli, and in some casesrestore concentration to fatigued individuals. These apparently benignqualities make stimulants (particularly amphetamine) attractive ``operational''drugs (taken in an effort to sustain or enhance performance), as well asso-called ``recreational drugs''. The non-regulated stimulant caffeineis taken for similar purposes.However, powerful stimulants do not avoid fatigue, but only postpone itand thereby compound its severity.Side-effects may include restlessness, increased anxiety, and confusion.Transportation employees may rely upon the drug beyond its period of effectiveness,resulting in the sudden onset of deep sleep. Sustained reliance on amphetaminesmay result in toxic effects such as paranoia and delirium, since increasingdoses are needed to offset developing tolerance. While it is widely heldthat stimulants do not produce true physical dependence, it is also recognizedthat they can induce a strong psychological dependence.Recent experience with cocaine has confirmed the dependency-producing characterof that drug, its potent psychoactivity, its ability to induce seizuresafter a single dose, and its ability to produce psychosis after chronicuse. <T3>See, e.g., Cocaine: Pharmacology, Effects, and Treatment of Abuse,</T3>Research Monograph Series, No. 50 (National Institute on Drug Abuse1984). Reports of drug experiences suggest strongly that cocaine use maypromote risk-taking and cause the user to over-estimate his degree of control.Cocaine is not an attractive ``operational'' drug becuase of it short duration,but use by an employee prior to reporting for work may result in depressionor exacerbate fatigue, leaving the employee poorly equipped to undertakea full work day. Because dependency on cocaine may manifest itself abruptlyafter a long period of apparently successful ``occasional'' use, the cocaineabuser's private ``recreation'' may become a matter of public safety concernat any time without warning.Although no experimental studies reflecting effects of stimulants overan extended time period have been reported, clinical experience suggeststhat these substances have a significant potential for producing behavioralchanges inimical to safety, particularly when used in high concentrationsor over a long period of time.<T3>Hallucinogens </T3>are ingested for the specific purpose of inducingeuphoria and a distortion of time and space. These drugs generally producerelaxation and shortened attention span. Hallucinogens have not been thesubject of responsible scientific research involving human subjects becauseof their capacity to produce psychotic reactions. Use of hallucinogensis of particular concern, since they may trigger mental disturbances thatcan last for extended periods or recur without warning.<T3>Marijuana </T3>is sometimes classified as an hallucinogen but has propertiesthat warrant its separate treatment. As the most popular illicit drug ofabuse, marijuana was once viewed by many Americans as a mild and relativelyharmless substance. However, as the potency of marijuana available on theillicit market increased and a large segment of the population gained experiencein its use, it became apparent that marijuana had emerged as a major publichealth and safety risk.By 1980, it could be said that marijuana impairs learning ability and interfereswith complex psychomotor performance, including driving. <T3>Marijuana Research Findings: 1980, </T3>Research Monograph Series No.31 (National Institute on Drug Abuse). In addition, marijuana became morewidely recognized as a threat to health. Institute of Medicine, NationalAcademy of Sciences, <T3>Marijuana and Health </T3>(National Academy Press 1982).According to the experimental studies, marijuana affects such sensory functionsas visual acuity, signal detection, and balance or standing steadiness.Motor performance on flight simulator tasks was adversely affected, aswere tracking tasks and pursuit rotor tracking. Closed-course and citydriving tests both indicated reduced driving precision, some of which theInstitute on Medicine (<T3>Id.</T3> at 118) assessed as indicating impairment of judgment as wellas car handling skills.Laboratory studies have also demonstrated reduced vigilance in signal detectiontasks. Studies evaluating cognitive functions indicated that marijuanamay reduce risk taking, but also show that marijuana reduces performancein divided attention situations.Recent research has suggested the possibility of next-day after effectsfrom marijuana that may reduce performance on complex divided attentiontasks. Yesavage, Leirer, Denari and Hollister, ``Carry-Over Effects ofMarijuana Intoxication on Aircraft Pilot Performance: A Preliminary Report''<T3>(Am. J. Psychiatry </T3>142:1325-1329 (1985)). Some experts also believethat the accumulation of cannabinoids in the body through chronic use mayproduce adverse effects that do not abate at any time while the marijuanahabit is sustained. Since marijuana metabolites have been identified atlow levels in the urine for as long as 77 days after cessation of heavyand chronic use, the possibility of significant chronic effects cannotbe excluded. <T3>See </T3>Ellis, Mann, Judson, Schramm and Tashchian, ``Excretion Patternsof Cannabinoid Metabolites After Last Use in a Group of Chronic Users''<T3>(Clin. Pharmacol. Ther. </T3>38:572-578 (1985)).<T3>In summary, </T3>drugs in each of the classes of controlled substanceshave mind and function-altering effects on the human subject. Recent researchinvolving several widely-used drugs vividly illustrates the correlationamong clinical data, theoretical pharmacology, and performance on transportation-relatedtasks. Smiley, Moskowitz, and Ziedman, ``Effects of Drugs on Driving'',DHHS Publication No. (ADM)85-1386 (National Institute on Drug Abuse andNational Highway Traffic Safety Administration 1985). Smiley, <T3>et al., </T3>examined the effects of secobarbital and diazepam (CNSdepressants), marijuana and alcohol in a complex, blind study using a drivingsimulator. The study measured performance on a variety of driving tasks,including stop or swerve decisions, tracking, passing, and maintainingdistance at two dosage levels for each drug. The results revealed differencesin particular effects and performances in individual phases of the study.However, when the data were combined the authors concluded as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Secobarbital, diazepam, marijuana, and alcohol were all found to impairperformance of a variety of simulated driving tasks. Drug levels testedfor secobarbital and diazepam were therapeutic doses; the marijuana doseswere considered moderate to strong by the subject population used; thealcohol effects were reported for levels up to and slightly above the legallimit. <T3>No clear-cut differences in the pattern of effects were found amongthe drugs tested. </T3>All drugs impaired perceptual-motor skills <T3>(e.g., </T3>tracking, speed and headway control), perceptual taskswhere response time and detection ability were measured, and decisionmakingtasks.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T3>Id. </T3>19 (emphasis supplied). This research suggests that the subtledifferences in the way that certain drugs affect human functions may beless important than the overall disordering effect of those drugs on theuser's ability to respond to the complex challenges posed by the transportationenvironment. Those effects may be exacerbated by use of two or more drugsin combination.Finally, as noted above, many of the detrimental effects of drugs relatenot so much to the toxic or acute action of the drug when it may be foundin high concentrations in the blood stream, but rather to the chronic orcumulative action of the drug on the body and the mind. Much of this long-termimpairment of the organism is poorly understood, but what is known is asource of concern.ConclusionsThe full extent of drug effects and the dose-response characteristics ofindividual drugs on particular subjects is the subject of continuing study.Such study could be expected to continue indefinitely, even if the pharmacopoeiawere a closed class and a steady stream of new compounds were not beingintroduced into licit and illicit marketplaces on a daily basis. But thefact that continuing study is warranted does not mean that no other actionis appropriate. It is important to draw reasonable conclusions from theavailable data that can help to protect the public safety.The only responsible conclusion that can be drawn from available evidenceis that the non-medical use of controlled substances among transportationemployees in safety-sensitive functions constitutes a clear threat to thepublic safety. The threat flows from the after-effects, chronic effects,and withdrawal effects of these substances, as well as the more heavily-researchedacute effects. Any set of countermeasures must therefore encourage drugabusers in the subject populations to abate their habits or seek treatmentfor their chemical dependencies, as appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="84">FRA Conclusions and Proposals (With Section-by-Section Analysis)</ITAG>FRA proposes to amend Part 219 of Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations,Control of Alcohol and Drug Use in Railroad Operations, by adding a prohibitionon non-authorized use of controlled substances by a covered employee atany time and by mandating a program of random testing. Commenters are requestedto address the interrelationships among the proposed provisions and existingregulatory provisions.<ITAG tagnum="84">General Provisions</ITAG>Responsibility for ComplianceSection 219.9 would be amended to include reference to the responsibilityof a railroad to comply with the new andSection; 219.102 and the random testingprovisions of subpart G, and the testing safeguards of subpart H. Thisprovision specifies when a railroad will be liable for a civil penalty.Implied ConsentSection 219.11 would be amended to require that covered employees consentto random testing under the circumstances specified in the proposed rule.Under the current rule, consent to the tests is required and is impliedas a matter of law. However, the regulations do not authorize physicalcoercion.<ITAG tagnum="84">Prohibition on Use of Controlled Substances</ITAG>FRA proposes to add a new andSection; 219.102 to the current rule prohibitingan employee who performs covered service from using a controlled substanceat any time, whether on duty or off duty, except as permitted by andSection;219.103. Section 219.103 of the current rule permits use of a therapeuticcontrolled substance as approved by a medical practitioner and at the prescribedor authorized dosage. It is important to include licit drugs in the generalprescription of use, since certain therapeutic drugs can have effects manyhours or even days subsequent to last ingestion, making a uniform pre-dutyabstinence period impractical.<ITAG tagnum="84">Random Testing Program</ITAG>Random Testing IssuesFRA proposes to amend 49 CFR Part 219 by adding a new subpart G mandatinga program of random testing for railroad employees subject to the currentalcohol and drug rule. Commenters are asked to address the following generalissues in light of the specific discussion that follows:1. What additional data is available concerning the prevalence of druguse by railroad employees? How do data collected by individual railroadscompare with mandatory post-accident testing statistics set forth above?2. If FRA adopts a random testing mandate, what level of detail shouldbe specified? Should the FRA dictate the method of random selection ormerely review proposed methodologies? If FRA dictates a method, what methodwould be suitable for all railroads, given their diversity in size, resourceand operations?3. Should FRA exclude small employers? What should the cutoff point be?What special problems would small railroads face in implementing randomtesting? Should the random testing requirement exclude railroads with 15or fewer Hours of Service employees, as is currently the case for certainelements of the existing rule? (See further discussion below.)4. Would it be possible to make multi-employer arrangements for selectionand/or testing of employees, particularly with respect to smaller railroads?What facilitating role should FRA play in this process, if any?5. What problems do the railroads foresee with respect to administrationof a random selection program and the availability of employees for regularor unscheduled assignments? Will hours of service restrictions pose problems?What design elements could be included in a random testing program to alleviateor avoid these problems?6. As a matter of cost-effectiveness, would it make sense to focus therandom testing program on employees with particularly critical functions,such as locomotive engineers, dispatchers or operators? Should the programbe phased in by craft or function? Should the random testing rule be extendedto apply to other safety-sensitive employees, particularly maintenance-of-waypersonnel; or, conversely, should it be limited to certain categories ofHours of Service employees? Does the Hours of Service Act establish theappropriate distinction between those railroad employees who should besubject to random testing and those for whom such tests are not necessary?Where should the line be drawn? (In this, as in other areas, FRA reservesthe right to broaden or constrict the final rule based on analysis of commentsreceived.)7. What would be the cost of a random testing program in employee/supervisorytime, expenses of collection and shipping, laboratory analysis, and follow-upsteps?8. What level of effort would provide the greatest level of benefit givencost and other considerations? FRA proposes to use an annual sampling rate(``level of effort'') of <T3>up to </T3>125 percent of covered employees. Comments are invited onhow much lower this potential maximum level of effort could be set whilestill maintaining a credible deterrent. Comments on the optimum level ofeffort, as well as FRA's suggestion below regarding the adjustment of levelbased on effectiveness of the program, are encouraged. Please relate recommendationsconcerning level of effort to effectiveness in reducing or eliminatingdrug use incidence. Will the relationship between level of effort and effectivenessbe linear? Is it possible to pre-identify an optimum level of effort froma cost-benefit standpoint? Is any level of risk acceptable? Will the natureof the sanction applied (<T3>e.g.</T3>, dismissal or suspension and requirement for treatment) impacteffectiveness at a constant level of effort?9. Should employers be allowed or required to limit the size of the populationsubject to a full range of testing strategies (<T3>e.g.</T3>, pre-employment, reasonable cause, post-accident, random)to those sub-groups of employees for whom an initial round of testing hasrevealed a more serious drug-use problem? (In such a case, the employersmight be able to rely on a less costly set of requirements to ensure thatemployees in sub-groups with less serious or more easily determined problemsremain risk free.) In addition, are there ways employers may avail themselvesof less costly and less intrusive technologies as such advances are madewhile ensuring an appropriate level of safety? Commenters are requestedto submit any empirical data that support their views.10. Would a high level of effort add sufficient deterrence to reduce thecosts of and need for rehabilitation over a period of time? What wouldthe impact of a low level of effort (<T3>e.g.</T3>, 12.5%) or a high level of effort (125%) be on voluntaryEAP referrals? (Please state assumption with respect to consequence froma positive test.)11. Should additional drugs or drug groups be included in the testing requirement?If so, which drugs?12. For what maximum period is it reasonable to follow up employees whotest positive and are referred for rehabilitation? To what extent shouldaftercare be dictated by individual clinical decisions, rather than byregulation?13. Are there any other ways to reduce costs or improve the effectivenessof the proposed rule? For example, are there any ways to grant employersflexibility without compromising the objectives of the rule? What wouldbe the likely cost savings, if any, in more flexible approach?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Commenters should include available supporting information, includingempirical and cost/benefit data, with comments submitted in response tothese questions.Commenters should note, however, that it is not necessary to respond toall questions posed in order to have individual responses considered.Specific Provisions<T3>Section 219.601(a) </T3>would require each railroad to submit to FRAa random testing program that complies with the requirements of subpartG. Programs developed by railroads would be submitted to FRA for approval120 days after the effective date of the rule. FRA would review each railroadprogram to ensure that it complies with the criteria set forth in the rule.If, after implementation, a railroad wishes to amend its program, the railroadwould be required to file notice of the amendment with FRA at least 30days prior to intended implementation. This section expressly prohibitsthe implementation of random testing programs under this subpart priorto their approval by FRA. <T3>Paragraph (b) </T3>sets forth criteria for the form of the random testingprograms. It requires each railroad to develop a testing program that selectsemployees on a basis that is random, <T3>i.e., </T3>where every covered employee has an equal statistical chanceof being selected on any selection date or within a given time frame. Thesection specifically states that the method may not permit subjective factorsto play any role in selection. This requirement is for the purpose of eliminatingthe possibility that railroads will have any discretion in the selectionof employees to be tested.FRA is not proposing to mandate a specific industry-wide random selectionsystem at this time. That is, prior to hearings and comments that may bereceived in response to this proposal, FRA is not prepared to impose asingle, uniform random testing scheme. Such a plan would have to take intoaccount differences in the industry. Size, geographic diversity, and computercapability or expertise are factors which may dictate differing methodologies.On the basis of comments received, FRA may consider developing a selectionof random schemes which take into account these differences, yet complywith the criteria set forth above. FRA may also consider imposing a randomselection method of its own design for all carriers.<T3>Mode of selection </T3>is an important design element for a randomtesting program. Three generic models of ``random'' testing programs aresuggested for comment. First, a system could be devised that would ensurethat each employee would be tested at least once during a particular period,with the date for testing to be determined on a random basis. Retests couldbe required of a certain proportion of employees on a strictly random selectionbasis. Second, a strict random selection program could be devised thatwould select a certain number of employees based on the target population.Such a system would result in some employees not being tested during thesubject period and others being tested more than once. This is the conceptcontained in the rule draft, but is only one of the alternatives underconsideration. Third, it would be possible to do unweighted random selectionin the first instance, but employ a statistical bias against re-selection,and a much greater (or even absolute) bias against a second or third re-selection.Under such a system, only a few employees would not be tested in a givenperiod, the possibility of selection would be real at all times, and allemployees would be protected from an excessive number of repeated negativetests. Additionally, a bias against re-selection would work to increasethe probability that all employees are tested.<T3>Level of effort </T3>is also a crucial element in the design of anyrandom testing program. Comment is solicited regarding the effectiveness,cost and feasibility of levels of effort ranging up to 125 percent of thetotal number of covered employees employed by the railroad at the beginningof a given year. The level selected would be a minimum requirement forrandom testing, with individual railroads free to increase their levelof testing subject to FRA approval.FRA is considering whether programs should provide for adjustment of theminimum level based upon the success of the program. Although a numericaltarget is needed as a benchmark for discussion, in actual practice theremay come a point of sharply diminishing returns from any set level as themix of countermeasures detects most chronic substance abuse and deterscasual use. The testing program could be designed so that it could be phasedup or down as appropriate and in response to the pattern of results obtainedthrough the program. In combination with post-accident testing experience,the results of random testing would provide the most useful gauge of theneed. FRA is considering whether there are circumstances under which theprogram should allow for the level of effort to be increased or scaledback based on a method of evaluation stated in the rule or on individualrailroad application and specifically requests comments on this issue.FRA also solicits comments on whether railroads that develop exemplaryrecords should be relieved at some future time from some or all of therequirements of this proposal. As with other issues, FRA reserves the rightto make appropriate adjustments in the rule in response to public comments.Although we propose at this time to leave the methodology for random selectionto the employer to devise, several components of the program are set forthin the proposed rule. An essential feature of a random testing scheme isthat the employee selected for testing not have notice of his selectionuntil the day of testing, and then only such notice as is reasonably necessaryto ensure the employee's presence for testing. The absence of advance warningis critical to avoiding the artificial effects of deliberate temporaryabstinence designed to avoid detection. (Of course, it will be necessaryfor certain other railroad personnel to have some advance warning of selectionin order to ensure job assignments are protected.)The proposal states that the employee is subject to random testing on anyday that the employee is on duty, scheduled for duty, or rested under theHours of Service Act and subject to call. The intent of the proposal isthat the railroad would either test employees already on duty to performcovered service or would, in fact, call employees to duty for the purposeof testing (<T3>i.e., </T3>employees would be compensated for making themselves availablefor testing under circumstances where they are required to be availablefor covered service). This approach is designed to balance the practicalconcerns that the railroad may have about delaying operations for the purposeof testing and the need to give notice to employees of the times they maybe called upon to cooperate in random testing. The requirement gives therailroad some flexibility in developing a program that will not undulyinterfere with its operations (as long as that program meets the randomnessrequirements of this subpart). In addition, because the employee may bechosen for testing only when on duty or subject to call, selection fortesting will not interfere with the employee's off-duty rest time, sickleave, or vacation.<T3>Paragraph (c) </T3>would require FRA approval in writing of randomtesting programs submitted under paragraph (a). Should the FRA find anyportion of the random testing program submitted by the railroad to be inconsistentwith the FRA criteria, FRA will inform the railroad with a specific explanationregarding the necessary revisions. The railroad must resubmit its programwithin 30 days or be considered in violation of the requirement to implementa random testing program.<T3>Paragraph (d) </T3>would require implementation by the railroads ofrandom testing programs approved by the FRA within 90 days of the railroad'sreceipt of FRA approval. It sets forth the requirement that a railroadshall require covered employees selected through an approved random testingprogram to cooperate in urine testing, and that such testing shall complywith the conditions and procedures set forth in subparts G and H. Thisparagraph states that the purpose of testing is to determine compliancewith the prohibition against the misuse of controlled substances containedin the new section 219.102.<T3>Section 219.603 </T3>would outline the procedures to be followed whena laboratory reports that controlled substances have been detected in theemployee's sample. <T3>Paragraph (a) </T3>provides that a test will be deemed positive onlyafter it has been confirmed as required by subpart H and then only afterreview by a Medical Review Officer (MRO), to whom all laboratory test resultswould be sent. Interposition of the MRO between the laboratory and railroadsupervision will help ensure that information concerning authorized useof therapeutic drugs will not be disclosed to a wider circle of personsthan is necessary and that laboratory data requiring interpretation isproperly explicated before it is reported. The MRO would not be requiredto discuss the test results with the employee prior to declaring them positive,but would be free to do so if it appeared appropriate under the circumstances.The MRO would be required to request and review all relevant informationconcerning use of drugs detected by the laboratory that have therapeuticuses.The MRO must be a licensed physician with knowledge of substance abusedisorders and the appropriate medical training to interpret and evaluateall positive test results, together with the employee's medical historyand any other relevant biomedical information. A railroad could utilizesalaried medical officers on its staff or contract physicians with appropriatetraining to perform this function.<T3>Paragraph (b) </T3>would require that the employee receive a copy ofthe laboratory report if the MRO declares the test to be positive. Likeother phases of the testing process, the laboratory report would be requiredto meet the requirements of subpart H. The MRO would issue all negativeresults (those not constituting evidence of non-authorized use of a controlledsubstance) over his own signature, since otherwise it would be possibleto distinguish those tests involving ``positive'' laboratory findings thatare declared negative by the MRO.<T3>Paragraph (c) </T3>permits the railroad to immediately suspend an employeefrom covered service on the basis of a test result declared positive bythe MRO. This is consistent with practice in the railroad industry andother transportation modes where there is a firm basis for belief thatthe employee presents a threat to his own safety or that of the public.<T3>Paragraph (d) </T3>sets forth the procedural requirements for employeeswho elect to claim the right to investigation of the rule charge. The provisionrequires notice and an opportunity for a prompt hearing. Where the provisionsof a collective bargaining agreement govern, compliance with the collectivebargaining agreement satisfies the requirements of the rule. These agreementshave consistently been construed to require adequate notice of the chargesand a full hearing on all factual issues. An employee who has such an agreementalso enjoys the right to have an unresolved dispute adjusted by a neutralarbitrator (under section 3 of the Railway Labor Act). No purpose wouldbe served by requiring a separate ``Federal'' hearing.<T3>Section 219.605 </T3>would require maintenance of records relatingto random testing for 5 years and impose restrictions on use of those records.(See discussion below regarding confidentiality of this data.)<ITAG tagnum="85">Consequences of Drug Use Detection: Discipline, Abatement and Rehabilitation</ITAG>We join with the other Modal Administrations now engaged in drug preventionrulemakings in soliciting specific comment on three generic options fordealing with the issue of rehabilitation as a matter of right. Under thoseoptions, an opportunity for rehabilitation would be required (and disciplinarysanctions barred) for_<T3>Option 1. </T3>Those who test positive on any required test or whocome forward voluntarily;<T3>Option 2. </T3>Those who test positive on a random or periodic test,or who come forward voluntarily; or<T3>Option 3. </T3>Only those who come forward voluntarily.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">These options are presented against the background of the policy ofFRA's current rule, which gives management the latitude to determine whetheron-the-job drug use or impairment should lead to a disciplinary sanction.The options may be further refined to an almost infinite degree and couldalso be varied by including sources of drug use information other thanchemical tests.For instance, FRA's reasonable cause testing rule is presently designedto identify and document alcohol drug use and impairment in the workplace.A positive urine test creates a rebuttable presumption of impairment, unlessthe employee claims the optional right to a blood test. If a blood testresult is available, then the factfinder proceeds on the basis of the twochemical tests (particularly the blood test) and other information availableconcerning the demeanor or performance of the employee. The railroad currentlyremains free, however, to apply a more stringent drug-free rule, barringunauthorized use of drugs at any time; and many railroads do so. If theFRA rule is changed to bar unauthorized drug use at any time (as proposedherein), it would be possible to retain the current structure for casesof on-the-job use or impairment, while either leaving the railroads freeto apply their own policies or requiring that employees who have not beendemonstrated to have used drugs on the job be given the opportunity forrehabilitation. Similar options would be pertinent to results of mandatorypost-accident tests, where blood tests and performance information areroutinely available. Although these issues are beyond the scope of thisrulemaking, they form a necessary backdrop for issues presented here.<T3>Random testing and consequences. </T3>The present proposal raises theissue of what consequences should flow from a confirmed and fully reviewedpositive following a random drug test. It is clear, in the first instance,that the employee should have the right to a hearing on the question ofdrug use if he or she wishes to claim it. The proposed rule text describedabove provides for that right. The next obvious question is whether therailroad should be free to apply disciplinary sanctions or should be requiredto provide the employee a one-time opportunity for rehabilitation. Further,if this right is recognized, should it be available to employees who havepreviously taken advantage of a similar option under existing rules (<T3>e.g., </T3>the co-worker report provision of 219.405) or railroad corporatepolicies?<T3>Advantages of discipline. </T3>Leaving employers free to take disciplinaryaction when illicit drug use is detected, or requiring that such actionbe taken, has obvious advantages. First and most important, it permitsemployers to impose strict sanctions. The threat that such sanctions willbe imposed can create a high degree of deterrence against occasional use.Further, the threat of sanctions will create powerful incentives for earlyself-referral, since the consequences of accepting rehabilitation earlywill be materially more favorable than the consequences of being detectedlater. In this sense, allowing employer latitude to sanction emphasizesprevention.Second, testing with stiff sanctions on positives need not be as extensiveas testing that does not produce an equal level of deterrence, since thethreat of detection will modify behaviors in many cases before individualdrug users are actually required to provide a specimen.Third, allowing flexibility in the random testing context may be more consistentwith sound practice for other forms of testing. In those cases where druguse has characteristics that are clearly job-related in an immediate sense(<T3>e.g., </T3>where an employee tests positive after causing a personalinjury to a co-worker, or where an employee tests positive for a drug afterbeing identified for reasonable suspicion testing on the job), permittingthe employer to apply disciplinary sanctions is more clearly proportionalto the harm that the employee has caused in the workplace (whether it bethe personal injury or disruption of the railroad's operations associatedwith removing the employee from service and obtaining a replacement). Further,no sound regulatory policy could insulate employees engaged in unsafe practicesfrom the discipline applicable to those practices, independent of any detectedalcohol or drug use. Treatment professionals and recovering substance abusersoften point out that the chemically dependent should face the consequencesof their actions, although they should not be penalized for the statusof being dependent. Mandating rehabilitation after positive random testsmay raise expectations regarding what is reasonable after tests in connectionwith accidents and unsafe practices.Fourth, mandating the opportunity for rehabilitation after detection couldbe characterized as a form of ``enabling'' behavior that facilitates, ratherthan discourages, further abuse. The literature of substance abuse counselingis replete with discussions of such behavior.<T3>Advantages of rehabilitation in lieu of discipline. </T3>However, argumentscan also be made for requiring that employers should provide opportunitiesfor rehabilitation in appropriate instances. Although testing with theoption of rehabilitation creates only a limited deterrent effect, the factthat rehabilitation is available can reassure those subject to testingthat the program has remedial, rather than punitive objectives. Providingthis reassurance can help enlist the support of the workforce for the testingprogram and an overall prevention effort.Second, in those cases where drug use is not yet accompanied by a cleardeterioration in performance, rehabilitation may be viewed as a more appropriateresponse.Third, the opportunity for rehabilitation can salvage the employer's investmentin the training the employee has received and the experience that the employeehas accumulated, while reducing the possibility that the employee willcontinue a drug abuse habit to the detriment of the employee and societyat large. FRA notes that it has long encouraged railroads to test employeesin the context of its medical qualification programs, with the test resultsto be used exclusively in the context of those programs. Railroads haveresponded with a variety of approaches, all of which include confidentialhandling and an opportunity for rehabilitation of employees testing positive.<T3>Hybrid models. </T3>It should be noted that discipline and rehabilitationare not necessarily incompatible. On certain railroads, alcohol an drugviolations lead to immediate dismissal; however, the relevant collectivebargaining provisions require probationary reinstatement if the offenderagrees to participate in the EAP program and thereafter remains alcoholand/or drug-free during the probationary period. (These are known as ``companionagreements'' and form an optional element of Operation Red Block, the jointlabor/railroad/FRA prevention program.) This hybrid approach is viewedas having significant value, since it provides incentives for the alcoholor drug user to resolve his or her problem and makes it clear that no arbitratoror grievance settlement will rescue that employee from making an importantchange in his or her life.<T3>Alcohol. </T3>FRA notes that any abatement/rehabilitation requirementsapplying to use of drugs will need to be sufficiently precise to addressuse of alcohol as a significant subset. Railroads have a strong traditionof prohibiting any alcohol use or the presence of any amount of alcoholin the blood while an employee is on duty. Although the present rulemakingdoes not address random testing for alcohol, that subject presents a discreteand complex problem, since alcohol can remain in urine long after it fallsto nondetectable levels in the blood; and alcohol use off duty could notbe subject to blanket prohibition.<T3>Form of rehabilitation. </T3>Any Federal requirement that rehabilitationbe provided should be consistent with existing regulations applicable torailroad employees. Those regulations recognize that some casual drug userscan simply abate (discontinue) their drug use habits given sufficient incentive,while others will require counseling and treatment. Those requiring counselingand treatment for chronic drug abuse problems and chemical dependencieswill typically require secondary care involving outpatient attention and/orparticipation in self-help groups, as well as careful monitoring by theEAP counselor.<T3>One-time right. </T3>As a general rule, it is important that any opportunityfor rehabilitation be a one-time right, rather than an open invitationto the continued misuse of drugs. However, the passage of an extended periodof time may warrant a revival of this right. FRA requests comments on whetherany right to rehabilitation should include a revival of the opportunityafter a set period (e.g., 5 years, 10 years).<T3>Comments solicited. </T3>FRA solicits comments on all options for responseto drug use detected through a positive random drug test_from mandatoryrehabilitation, on the one hand, to mandatory discipline, on the other,including allowing latitude for individual employers to establish and publishpolicies of their own design. Specifically, FRA seeks comments on the threerehabilitation options discussed above that are under consideration byDOT modal administrations and their applicability in the railroad context.<ITAG tagnum="84">Follow-Up Testing</ITAG>Depending on the regulatory determinations made with respect to optionsfor rehabilitation and the decisions of railroads consistent therewith,a range of situations will arise involving the return to service of employeeswho have tested positive, indicating past drug use. It may then be necessaryto conduct additional tests to ensure continued disassociation from drugs,particularly for those who are not participating in a formal, structuredprogram of aftercare. Should a final rule be adopted in this proceeding,FRA will provide procedures for the conduct of such tests. Public commentis invited regarding those procedures.For example, should there be a uniform testing period after primary abatement/treatment,or should this be determined on a case-by-case basis? Who should make sucha determination (<T3>i.e., </T3>the EAP counselor, the MRO, both, or a third party)? Shouldthe employee be involved? How could employee involvement be accomplished?If a uniform post-treatment period is adopted, how long should it be? Shouldthe length of the follow-up period depend on the drug or drug class detected?Should it depend on the severity of the individual's drug problem, as indicatedby the kind of treatment that was found to be necessary? Could follow-uptesting be excused where aftercare is highly structured or itself includeschemical monitoring?During the period after primary abatement or treatment, should FRA prescribethe minimum and/or maximum number of tests to be administered? Tests shouldbe given with sufficient frequency to ensure that the employee is freeof drugs. However, testing should not become an instrument of harassment.One alternative, on which comment is also invited, would be a specifiedpost-treatment testing period that would apply only if the employee, theEAP counselor, and perhaps the employer failed to agree on an individualizedprogram. Such a fall-back system could provide, for example, for up tofour additional tests over the 12 months following primary abatement/treatment.A drawback of this alternative might be the reluctance of the EAP counselorto insist on appropriate follow-up testing, either because of an excessof confidence in his clinical judgment or because imposing such a requirementmight be seen as interfering with the professional/client relationship(<T3>i.e., </T3>by seeming to suggest a lack of confidence in the client).On the other hand, there is significant evidence of an anecdotal natureto repose trust in substance abuse professionals who perform EAP functions,based on their handling of the very diverse current case load.<ITAG tagnum="84">Confidentiality</ITAG>FRA solicits comments on the extent to which the random drug test resultand matters related to subsequent disposition of the employee, whetherthrough discipline or treatment, should be required to be held in confidence.Section 219.605 of the proposed rule text contains certain general rules.The issue of confidentiality involves handling of data within the company,as between the company and collective bargaining representatives (who havea duty of representation under the agreement and the Railway Labor Act),as between the company and government agencies, and as between the companyand other parties.One approach would require that confidentiality be maintained regardingthe random test result, any referral for evaluation and treatment and subsequenthandling, and follow-up testing. However, test results would have to beavailable for purposes of a railroad investigation under the collectivebargaining agreement, if discipline were contemplated or if the employeedemanded the right to a hearing. Confidentiality might be totally or partiallywaived if the employee failed to cooperate in treatment or abate the useof controlled substances or if the employee was later determined, afterinvestigation, to have been involved in an alcohol or drug-related disciplinaryoffense growing out of subsequent conduct.It should be noted that confidentiality would not be required in aid ofany constitutional right to privacy. The courts have not recognized a privacyright with respect to illicit drug use (by contrast to medical use of drugs,where a qualified right of privacy has been recognized). However, no publicpurpose is served by publication of information concerning drug use ofindividual railroad employees, except as may be necessary to conduct accidentinvestigations and similar inquiries directly affecting public safety.Imposing a duty of confidentiality could reduce the perceived intrusivenessof the test procedure.We expressly invite comment on the desirability of adopting confidentialityrequirements. Comments should address handling of drug testing and referralinformation within the corporate structure of the employer, as well asrelease of the information to persons outside the enterprise. With respectto dissemination outside the corporate structure, four basic options include(i) release of data only at the specific request of a future employer witha need to know, (ii) release at the discretion of the employer conductingthe test, and (iii) release only at the request of the employee. Underthe third option, a subsequent employer could require that an applicanteither disclose prior drug test results or give the employer permissionto obtain prior drug test results as a condition of employment. A fourthoption (see section 219.605 of the proposed rule text) would be to authorizerelease of test results to future employers only in specified circumstances.This could be done under defined circumstances or only at the request ofthe employee (in a manner similar to release of National Driver Registerinformation to motor carriers).An additional complicating factor is enforcement of redisclosure restrictions.For instance, it would be important for a railroad hiring a former employeeof another railroad to know of any substance abuse history, whether ornot rehabilitation appeared successful as of the date of application. Thenew employer would need to retain a confidential record of this informationsince, in the event the employee became involved in drug abusing behavioragain, prior history would be relevant to the employee's right to an opportunityfor rehabilitation. Such information might also be pertinent to the individual'sprospects for recovery should a further opportunity be provided. However,by what means would redisclosure restrictions be enforceable against afuture employer not subject to FRA jurisdiction (e.g., a local bus company)?To what extent could such a problem be controlled by establishing a contractualrelationship between the applicant/employee and the new employer (<T3>i.e., </T3>enforceable at common law)?In addition to future employers, other individuals may want access to theresults of drug tests conducted under the proposed rules. The proposedprovision provides that no record of tests shall be used or disseminatedfor any purpose other than providing for compliance with the FRA alcohol/drugrule, including assessing disciplinary sanctions (where appropriate), exceptwith the voluntary written consent of the employee. It also would requireeach railroad to institute procedures to prevent inappropriate disclosure.The FRA requests comment on whether we can and should prohibit access tothe results of the anti-drug program to individuals other than the employerand the employee, such as the general public, or the news media. To whatextent should access be available to other government agencies that maywant the data for statistical, regulatory, or law enforcement purposes?This raises the related issue of whether the FRA should distinguish betweengeneral statistical data (the total number of positive tests at a companyin a month or year) and particularized data (name-specific data). Smalloperators who employ few individuals will have difficulty concealing theidentity of individuals tested under the proposed random testing program.Since small operators will have fewer individuals to test in any giventime period, even seemingly neutral statistical data might result in identificationof an individual employee who was dismissed or referred for treatment asa result of a confirmed positive test result. This potential problem couldbe exacerbated if the FRA requires that only a small percentage of employeesbe tested each year. However, anonymity would be protected if only largerrailroads were required to report aggregated data. This may suggest thatthe reporting requirements, as distinct from testing requirements, shouldbe limited to larger railroads, with monitoring of smaller railroads beingaccomplished by FRA's examination of records maintained by the railroad.FRA reserves the right to apply any confidentiality provisions that maybe crafted in response to this notice to the existing provisions of thealcohol/drug rule, without further notice. FRA notes that its previousattempt to elicit public comment regarding any need for the addition ofconfidentiality provisions to the current rule failed to elicit responseas commenters, almost without exception, focused on other issues of interest.(<T3>See</T3> 52 FR 2118, 2120; Jan. 20, 1987.)<ITAG tagnum="84">Small Railroads</ITAG>Under the existing FRA rule, railroads with 15 or fewer Hours of Serviceemployees are not required to conduct pre-employment drug screens. Thoserailroads do not enjoy the authority to test for reasonable cause and arenot subject to the requirements for voluntary referral and co-worker reportpolicies. However, these same railroads are required to conduct mandatorypost-accident testing.This proposal for random testing does not provide an exclusion for smallrailroads, and FRA specifically solicits comments on the following issues:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Is this approach (</ITAG><T3>i.e.,</T3> no exclusion) appropriate, or should the random testingrule contain an exclusion similar to that contained in the current rule?What are the economic cost/benefit considerations supporting the commenter'sposition?<ITAG tagnum="15">_If a final random testing rule includes the right to rehabilitation,should small railroads be required to institute voluntary referral andco-worker report policies?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Since a random testing mandate would require small railroads to makesome of the logistical arrangements necessary for pre-employment testingand some of the arrangements for authorized reasonable cause testing, aswell, should these provisions be made applicable to small railroads?</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(<T3>See,</T3> also, ``Regulatory Impact'' discussion below.)<ITAG tagnum="84">Procedures and Safeguards for Urine Drug Testing</ITAG>FRA proposes to further amend Part 219 by adding a new subpart H, whichwould mandate procedures and safeguards for urine drug testing under theexisting subparts D (reasonable cause testing) and F (pre-employment drugscreens), as well as the proposed subpart G (random testing). Althoughthe existing rules contain adequate safeguards and procedures, FRA believesthat making procedures uniform for all testing events will further ensurethe quality of urinalysis, promote uniformity with the practices of othertransportation companies, and permit all collection, testing and reportingto be done in a single manner regardless of the triggering event.Subpart H would not apply to collection of urines during mandatory post-accidenttesting (subpart C), since special procedures are required to provide forcollection and handling of the blood and urine specimens collected in thatcontext. However, comment is solicited regarding what elements of the subpartH procedures and safeguards might be separately incorporated in post-accidenttesting. Comment is also solicited on what special problems may be createdby an attempt to impose detailed, uniform sample collection proceduresin any case where the employee to be tested is injured and has been transportedto a medical facility where pre-arrangements have not been made for anFRA-mandated or authorized collection. Such an occasion could arise eitherin relation to a mandatory post-accident test, involving blood and urinecollection, or a reasonable cause test.Subpart H incorporates by reference the Department of Health and HumanServices' Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs(HHS Guidelines). Those Guidelines were published in final form in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> of April 11, 1988 (53 FR 11970), following noticeand comment. Individual copies are available from the Docket Clerk at theaddress set forth above. Although FRA proposes that standards for the collectionof specimens and laboratory analysis, etc., shall not be less stringentthan those contained in the HHS Guidelines, FRA solicits comments on theextent to which differences in practice may be required in order to accomplishcollection at independent medical facilities (a practice firmly establishedin FRA's current rule) and in order to recognize that private transportationcompanies, rather than government agencies, must administer the urine testingprogram.<T3>Section 219.701</T3> would require each railroad to submit its comprehensiveprogram for implementation of urine drug testing for FRA review and approval.FRA believes that the wide variety of railroad operating environments andinternal railroad organizations may necessitate specialized proceduresand assignments of responsibility consistent with the minimum standardsproposed for the new subpart. The section would also require publicationof notice to employees regarding the railroad's program.<T3>Section 219.703</T3> provides generally for what controlled substancesare to be detected, at what levels, and by what methods. Tests would beconducted for marijuana, cocaine, opiates, amphetamines and PCP. Testingof a specimen taken under this part for other biomedical purposes wouldnot be permitted. Certain drugs normally obtained by prescription, thebarbiturates and benzodiazepines, are also under consideration for mandatoryinclusion in the testing program. Comments are solicited regarding thecompounds to be included in the analysis.Detection limits for the drugs to be tested will be those specified inthe HHS Guidelines.Although the section restricts analysis of urine specimens to certain controlledsubstances, it incorporates an approval procedure to permit supplementarytesting under two general conditions. First, the railroad must explainwhy testing for the additional drug is requested. For example, a new drugmight come into wide usage due to easy street availability in a particularregion. Second, the railroad must establish that the drug can be reliablydetected and specifically confirmed by a laboratory certified by the Departmentof Health and Human Services to perform the necessary assays. FRA regardsthis proposal as creating a ``standby'' capability to address changingdrug use patterns and would not contemplate granting approvals under thissection in the immediate future.Use of alternative analytical methods would also be permitted upon an adequateshowing, consistent with the HHS Guidelines.<T3>Section 219.705</T3> would provide for review of positive reports bya Medical Review Officer (MRO), who would transmit the laboratory reportsto railroad supervision and the employee only after being satisfied thatthe report was evidence of unauthorized drug use. Negative reports wouldalso issue from the MRO over the MRO's signature (and without the accompanyinglaboratory report) in order to avoid identification of employees usingtherapeutic drugs or for whom the laboratory reported results insufficientin the judgment of the MRO to establish unauthorized use of a controlledsubstance.<T3>Section 219.707</T3> addresses retention and retesting of specimens.Positive specimens would be required to be retained for at least 365 days.The specimen would be automatically discarded unless a request for longerretention was made within that period. FRA encourages comments regardingthe retention period.The employee could make one request for a retest (reconfirmation), eitherby the original laboratory or by a second laboratory certified to performthe particular test.<ITAG tagnum="84">Responsibility for Compliance</ITAG>FRA proposes to add to the penalty schedule found in Appendix A, 49 CFRPart 219, to provide penalties for violations of the proposed Subpart Gon random testing. Comments are requested on the proposed penalty schedule,which will constitute an integral part of any final rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Reporting Requirements</ITAG>Finally, FRA proposes to amend 49 CFR Part 217 to require annual reportingof random testing, including results by drug, follow-up action by the railroad,and refusals to be tested. FRA specifically solicits comments regardingwhether more frequent reporting intervals may be appropriate. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact</ITAG>E.O. 12291 and DOT Regulatory Policies and Procedures The proposed rule has been evaluated in accordance with existing regulatorypolicies and is considered to be non-major under Executive Order 12291.However, it is considered to be significant under the DOT policies andprocedures (44 FR 11034; February 26, 1979) because it would initiate asubstantial regulatory program. Consequently, FRA has prepared and placed in the docket a regulatory evaluationaddressing the economic impact of the proposed rule. It may be inspectedand copied at Room 8201, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20590.Copies may also be obtained by submitting a written request to the FRADocket Clerk at the same address.The economic evaluation examines a range of options involving the conductin any year of random tests equal in number to 12.5 to 125 percent of theaffected employee population. The options also consider varying assumptionsfor the rate of positive tests at the inception of the program (5% vs.7.5%). The analysis identifies total estimated first year costs in therange of $2,207,395 to $22,828,300, including rehabilitation costs. Costswould decrease in successive years, as drug abuse is deterred and/or detectedand as rehabilitated former drug users begin to equal and then exceed thepopulation of employees who continue to use impairing drugs. The firstyear cost range not including rehabilitation is $1,337,219 to $9,775,656.The range of estimated costs for a ten-year period (discounted to currentvalue) is from $8,519,856 to $98,236,418 with rehabilitation costs includedand from $4,974,005 to $49,062,465 excluding rehabilitation costs. FRA has not been able to prepare an adequate quantitative estimate of benefitsfrom the proposed program. However, it is believed that the benefits ofthe proposed rule would substantially exceed its costs. Benefits wouldfall into at least three categories. First, consistent with the purposeof the program, railroad safety would be enhanced. Accidents and injurieswould be avoided. The extent of these direct benefits is difficult to estimate.Pre-1986 data for drug involvements in railroad accidents/injuries is extremelyfragmentary. Data developed under FRA's post-accident testing program isstill under review, but does indicate that drug use continues to have significantadverse effects on the safety of rail transportation. Over a period ofyears, a random testing rule would reduce this remaining risk materially.Second, employing railroads would benefit from certain indirect benefitsfrom the program. It is widely accepted by major United States corporations,including the railroads, that investments in substance abuse preventionand treatment programs are more than offset by avoidance of lost productivity,absenteeism, health costs, and other problems associated with substanceabusing employees. Random testing will create important incentives forearly self-referrals and/or provide an effective means of identifying thosewho are abusing drugs, supplementing voluntary referrals, supervisory referrals,medical evaluations, and other sources of referrals presently available.Third, society as a whole would realize indirect benefits from the program,as other public and private resources now devoted to dealing with the consequencesof drug abuse are turned to productive use. The 1988 GAO Report cited a Research Triangle Institute study, ``EconomicCosts to Society of Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Mental Illness'', whichestimated that the economic cost of drug abuse to the United States during1983 was $59.7 billion. This study, prepared by the Alcohol, Drug Abuseand Mental Health Administration (ADAMHA), estimated ``the costs of drugabuse to society for crime * * * reduced productivity, treatment, and otheritems. The estimate did not include items such as social costs (e.g., familyconflict, suicide) and the value of the illicit drugs consumed.'' A copyof the GAO report has been placed in the docket. As the FRA obtains otherdata on drug use, it will place that data in the docket. FRA welcomes comments on the methodology of the analysis and unit costsemployed in the analysis.Regulatory Flexibility ActThe Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 requires a review of proposed rulesto assess their impact on small entities. In reviewing the economic impactof the proposed rule, FRA concluded that the rule could have a significantimpact on a substantial number of small entities. FRA knows of no practicablealternatives for small employers to adopt that would reduce the cost ofcompliance yet achieve the levels of protection sought by these proposals.However, FRA also notes that in prior rulemakings significant differencesin safety risk factors have been identified that may apply to certain smallrailroads (e.g., 50 FR 31529, Aug. 2, 1985). A regulatory flexibility analysisdiscussing this issue in more detail has been placed in the docket. FRA specifically requests comment on the impact that this proposal wouldhave for the very small railroads in addition to comment on the impactof the proposal on small railroads in general.Paperwork Reduction ActThe rules proposed in this notice contain information collection requirementsin the following sections: 219.601, 219.603, 219.605, 219.701, 219.703,219.705, 219.707. Revised information collection requirements are alsocontained in the amendment to andSection; 217.13. FRA is submitting theseinformation collection requirements to the Office of Management and Budgetfor approval under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501<T3>et seq.</T3>). Any comments on the revised information collection requirementsshould be provided to Mr. Gary Waxman, Regulatory Policy Branch, Officeof Management and Budget, New Executive Office Building, 726 Jackson PlaceNW., Washington, DC 20503. Copies of any such comments should also be submittedto the docket of this rulemaking at the address provided above.Environmental ImpactFRA has evaluated these proposed regulations in accordance with its proceduresfor insuring full consideration of the environmental impacts of FRA actionsas required by the National Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. 4321 <T3>et seq.</T3>), other environmental statutes, Executive Orders and DOTorder 5610.1c. These proposed regulations meet the criteria that establishthis as a non-major action for environmental purposes.Federalism ImplicationsThe regulations proposed herein would not have substantial effects on thestates, on the relationship between the national government and the states,or on the distribution of power and responsibilities among the variouslevels of government. Thus, in accordance with Executive Order 12612, preparationof a Federalism Assessment is not warranted.<ITAG tagnum="84">Request for Public Comment</ITAG>FRA proposes to amend Parts 219 and 217 of Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations,as set forth below. FRA solicits comments on all aspects of the proposedrules and the data and analysis advanced in explanation of the proposedrules, whether through written submissions, or participation at the publichearings, or both. FRA may make changes in the final rules based on commentsreceived in response to this notice.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>49 CFR Part 217Railroad safety, Railroad operating rules, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. 49 CFR Part 219Railroad safety, Control of alcohol and drug use.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 202, 208 and 209 of the Federal Railroad SafetyAct of 1970, as amended (45 U.S.C. 431, 437, 438) and section 1.49 of theRegulations of the Office of the Secretary of Transportation (49 CFR 1.49).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC, on May 5, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John H. Riley,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Federal Railroad Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 219_[AMENDED]</ITAG>In consideration of the foregoing FRA proposes to amend Chapter II, SubtitleB, of Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations as follows:The authority citation for Part 219 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 202 and 209, Pub. L. 91-458, 84 Stat. 971 and975, as amended (45 U.S.C. 431, 438) and 49 CFR 1.49. Subpart C also issuedunder sec. 208, Pub. L. 91-458, 84 Stat. 974, as amended (45 U.S.C. 437).</ITAG>1. By amending Part 219 as follows:  a. Amend the table of contents to add new entries as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Random Drug Testing Program  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.601 Railroad random testing programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.603 Positive test results: consequences. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.605 Reports; FRA access to records; confidentiality.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart H_Procedures and Safeguards for Urine Drug Testing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.701 Railroad programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.703 Drugs tested. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.705 Review by MRO. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.707 Retest.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>b. Amend andSection;219.9(a) by revising paragraph (a)(1), redesignatingparagraph (a)(5) as (a)(7) and republishing it, and by adding new paragraphs(a)(5) and (a)(6) to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibility for compliance.  </ITAG>(a) A railroad that_  (1) Having actual knowledge, requires or permits an employee to go or remainon duty in covered service while in violation of andSection;219.101 or andSection;219.102; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(5) Fails to adopt or publish, or willfully and with actual knowledge failsto implement, a policy required by Subpart G of this part;  (6) Willfully and with actual knowledge, requires an employee to submitto testing under a program required by subpart G without observance ofthe procedures and safeguards contained in subpart G or subpart H of thispart; or  (7) Fails to comply with any other requirement of this part; shall be deemedto have violated this part and shall be subject to a civil penalty as providedfor in Appendix A.  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>c. Revise andSection;219.11(a) to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consent required; implied.  </ITAG>(a) Any employee who performs covered service for a railroad on or afterthe effective date of the relevant subpart shall be deemed to have consentedto testing as required in Subparts C, D, and G of this part; and consentis implied by the performance of such service.  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>d. Add a new andSection;219.102 to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibition on abuse of controlled substances.  </ITAG>No employee who performs covered service may use a controlled substanceat any time, whether on duty or off duty, except as permitted by andSection;219.103of this subpart.  e. Add a new Subpart G to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Random Testing  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.601 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Railroad random testing programs.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Submission. </T3>No later than 120 days after the effective date ofthis subpart, each railroad shall submit for FRA approval a random testingprogram meeting the requirements of this subpart. The program shall besubmitted to the Associate Administrator for Safety, FRA. If, after approval,a railroad desires to amend the random testing program implemented underthis subpart, the railroad shall file with FRA a notice of such amendmentat least 30 days prior to the intended effective date of such action. Aprogram responsive to the requirements of this section or any amendmentto the program shall not be implemented prior to approval.  (b) <T3>Form of programs. </T3>Random testing programs prepared by each railroadunder this subpart shall meet the following criteria:  (1) Selection of covered employees for testing shall be made by a methodbased on objective, neutral criteria which ensure that every covered employeehas an equal statistical chance of being selected within a specified timeframe. The method may not permit subjective factors to play a role in selection,<T3>i.e.</T3>, no employee may be selected as the result of the exerciseof discretion by the railroad. The selection method shall be capable ofverification with respect to the randomness of the selection process, andany records necessary to document the process shall be retained for notless than one year from the date upon which the particular tests were conducted. (2) The program shall select for testing in any given year a number ofcovered employees equal to [a percentage to be determined not to exceed125 percent] of the total number of covered employees employed by the railroadat the beginning of that year. A railroad may propose or FRA may require,after investigation and consultation, a higher level of testing.  (3) Notice of an employee's selection shall not be provided until the dayof testing, and then only such notice as is reasonably necessary to ensurethe employee's presence at the time and place set for testing on a basisreasonably convenient to the employee and the railroad.  (4) A covered employee is subject to random testing under this subparton any day that the employee is on duty, scheduled for duty, or is restedunder the Hours of Service Act and subject to call.  (5) The program shall include testing procedures and safeguards, and proceduresfor action based on positive test results, consistent with this part.(c) <T3>Approval. </T3>The Associate Administrator notifies the railroad inwriting whether the program is approved as consistent with the criteriaset forth in this subpart. If the Associate Administrator determines thatthe program does not conform to those criteria, the Associate Administratorinforms the railroad of any matters preventing approval of the program,with specific explanation as to revisions that are necessary. The railroadshall resubmit its program with the required revisions within 30 days ofsuch notice. Failure to resubmit the program with the necessary revisionswill be considered a failure to implement a program under this subpart.(d) <T3>Implementation. </T3>Within 90 days of receipt of approval of its testingprogram from FRA, the railroad shall implement that program. A railroadshall, under the conditions specified in this subpart and subpart H, requirea covered employee selected through the random testing program to cooperatein urine testing to determine compliance with andSection; 219.102.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.603 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Positive test results; procedures.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Medical review. </T3>A result of a test required under this subpartshall be deemed positive only after it has been (i) properly confirmedas required in Subpart H of this part and (ii) reviewed by a Medical ReviewOfficer (MRO) to determine if it is evidence of prohibited drug use undersection 219.102, as provided in subpart H. No information concerning anyunconfirmed screening test indicating presence of an analyte shall be reportedor otherwise communicated by a laboratory to any person at any time. Thissection establishes procedures for administrative handling by the railroadin the event a specimen provided under this subpart is reported as positiveby the MRO.(b) <T3>Notification. </T3>Within the period specified in andSection; 219.705(e)of this part, the railroad shall notify an employee of the results of anytest that is (i) positive, by providing a copy of a laboratory report meetingthe requirements of subpart H or (ii) negative, by providing a writtennotice issued by the MRO.(c) <T3>Suspension. </T3>If the railroad representative determines that thereis reason to believe that an employee is in violation of 219.102, as evidencedby a positive test result, the railroad may immediately remove the employeefrom covered service. In each case, the employee shall be provided withthe report of the test results and notice of the basis for the removal.(d) <T3>Hearing procedures. </T3>If an employee testing positive under thissection elects to claim the right of investigation of the rule charge thefollowing procedures shall apply:(1) The railroad shall provide written notice to the employee of the disciplinarycharges growing out of the test and an opportunity for hearing before apresiding officer.(2) The hearing shall be convened within the period specified in the applicablecollective bargaining agreement. In the absence of an agreement provision,the employee may demand that the hearing be convened within ten calendardays of any suspension arising from positive testing results or, in thecase of an employee who is unavailable due to injury, illness or othersufficient cause, within ten days of the date the charged employee becomesavailable for hearing.(3) A proceeding conforming to the requirements of an applicable collectivebargaining agreement, together with the provisions for adjustment of disputesunder section 3 of the Railway Labor Act, shall be deemed to satisfy therequirements of this paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.605 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports; FRA access to records; confidentiality.</ITAG>(a) Each railroad shall retain records of each test conducted under thissection for at least 5 years and make them available to FRA for review.(b) No record of tests conducted under this section or information drawntherefrom shall be used or disseminated for any purpose other than providingfor compliance with this part (and carrier rules consistent herewith),unless with the voluntary written consent of the employee. Each railroadshall institute procedures to guard this information against inappropriatedisclosure.(c) A railroad may advise another transportation operator to which an employeehas applied for employment (or with which an employee has obtained employment)in a safety-sensitive position of the nature of any disciplinary actionthat grows out of a positive test under this subpart. Reasonable effortshall be made to notify the employee of the provision of such information,and the employee shall be entitled to a copy of any writing describingsuch disciplinary disposition or positive test result. f. Add a new Subpart H to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart H_Procedures and Safeguards for Urine Drug Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.701 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Railroad programs.</ITAG>(a) The conduct of urine drug testing under subparts D, F, and G of thispart shall be governed by the ``Mandatory Guidelines for Federal WorkplaceDrug Testing Programs,'' 53 FR 11970 (April 11, 1988) and this subpart.Laboratories employed for these purposes must be certified by the Departmentof Health and Human Services under those guidelines. Where the Guidelinesrefer to ``Federal agencies'' or ``the agency,'' this shall mean ``therailroad'' for purposes of this regulation.(b) Within 120 days after the effective date of this subpart, each railroadshall submit for approval of the Associate Administrator for Safety a programof procedures and safeguards for the conduct of urine drug testing underthis subpart.(c) Each testing program shall be effectively published to all subjectemployees, who shall be provided actual notice in advance of being requiredto provide any specimen that they are subject to testing under this part,a detailed description of the circumstances under which testing may berequired, and at least summary information regarding the procedures andsafeguards contained in this subpart, specifically including the rightof an employee to receive a copy of test results on any specimen providedby the employee.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.703 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Drugs tested.</ITAG>(a) Urine specimens collected under subparts D, F, and G of this part shallbe analyzed only for the presence of designated controlled substances and,as necessary, to ascertain the degree of concentration of the urine orthe presence of adulterants.(b) Each specimen submitted shall be analyzed for marijuana, cocaine, PCP,opiates, and amphetamines, as provided in the HHS Guidelines.(c) A railroad may request approval of the Associate Administrator forSafety to test for additional controlled substances or by alternate methods.Such request shall_(1) Specify the proposed methods to be employed, the proposed detectionlimits, and the reason(s) why supplementary or alternative testing is deemedappropriate;(2) Provide information sufficient to establish the reliability of thescreening technique proposed and the reliability, accuracy, precision andspecificity of the confirmatory technique, as applicable; and(3) Certify that the laboratory is currently certified by the Departmentof Health and Human Services to perform the proposed assays.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.705 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review by MRO.</ITAG>(a) Test results reported positive by the laboratory as provided in theHHS Guidelines shall not be deemed positive or disseminated to any person(other than to the employee tested, if an interview is deemed appropriate)until they are reviewed by a Medical Review Officer (MRO) of the railroad.(b) The MRO or an attorney employed by the railroad shall also review thechain-of-custody record to determine that it contains no material variancefrom the requirements of the railroad program and this part. A materialvariance means any entry or omission that could reasonably lead to an errorin the collection, handling or testing of a covered employee's specimen.If a material variance is detected and the MRO deems the result positiveafter the medical review contemplated by this paragraph, then the resultshall nevertheless be reported as negative unless adequate and valid supplementarydocumentation has been obtained to remedy any variance in the chain-of-custodyrecord for the specimen.(c) The MRO shall complete review of test results within not more than10 days or they shall be declared negative, unless any portion of the delayshall result from the unwillingness or inability of the employee to appearfor an interview or provide documentation of prescription or other authorizeduse of medications. If the employee is responsible for such delay, the10 day period shall be extended by a period equal to the period attributedto the employee's delay.(d) After the MRO has reviewed the pertinent information and the laboratoryassessment is verified as indicating presence of controlled substancesunder circumstances indicating non-medical use, the MRO will report theresults to a designated railroad officer for action in keeping with therequirements of this part. The employee shall be provided a copy of theapproved test results within 48 hours of delivery to the railroad officer,or immediately upon the railroad's taking any action adverse to the employee,whichever first occurs.(e) Test results reported as negative by the laboratory shall also be communicatedto the employee through the MRO. The MRO shall immediately transmit thenegative finding to the employee (and, as the railroad may provide, tothe appropriate railroad officer) over the MRO's signature.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.707 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Retest.</ITAG>(a) Specimens that yield positive results on confirmation shall be retainedby the laboratory in properly secured, long-term, frozen storage for atleast 365 days. Within this 365-day period, the employee or his representative,the railroad, or the FRA may request that the laboratory retain the specimenfor an additional period. If the laboratory does not receive a requestto retain the specimen during the 365-day period, the specimen may be discarded.(b) In the case of a test declared positive by the MRO, the original specimenshall be retested at the written request of the employee. The employeemay specify retesting by the original laboratory, or by a second laboratorydesignated or accepted by the employee that is certified by the Departmentof Health and Human Services to perform the relevant confirmatory test.(c) If the employee specifies retesting by a second laboratory, the originallaboratory shall follow approved chain-of-custody procedures in transferringa portion of the sample. Unless the test by the second laboratory failsto confirm the analysis provided by the first, the employee shall be responsiblefor all costs associated with the retest.(d) Since some analyses may deteriorate during storage, detected levelsof the drug below the detection limits established in the HHS Guidelines,but equal to or greater than the established sensitivity of the assay,shall, as technically appropriate, be reported and considered corroborativeof the original positive results.g. Amend Appendix A to add the following:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L1,i1,7,r200,10,10</C><T4>Appendix A._Schedule of Civil Penalties \1\</T4><H1>Section</H1><H1> </H1><H1>Violation</H1><H1>Intentional violation \2\</H1><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Subpart G_Random Drug Testing</T2><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">219.601<D>Failure to implement and/or submit to FRA for approval a random drugtesting program that satisfies the requirements of this subpart and subpartH</D><D/><D>2,500</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Failure to facilitate conduct of required random drug testing by failingto take all practical steps to require employee participation or by otherwisefailing to comply with Subpart G such that test cannot be conducted</D><D>1,000</D><D>2,500</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Required employee to provide samples in reliance on Subpart G wherenot required</D><D>750</D><D>2,500</D><ITAG tagnum="1">219.603<D>Required employee to submit to testing without observance of proceduresand safeguards contained in Subparts G and H</D><D/><D>2,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">219.605<D>Failure to provide notice of positive test result or failure to provideopportunity for hearing meeting procedural requirements</D><D>1,000</D><D>2,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Failure to comply with other Subpart G requirement</D><D>500</D><D>1,250</D><ITAG tagnum="28">*                  *                  *                  *                 *                  *                  *</ITAG><F>\1\ Section 209 of the Federal Railroad Safety Act of 1970 (45 U.S.C.438) requires the Secretary of Transportation to ``include in or make applicableto, any railroad safety rule, regulation, order or standard issued underthis title a civil penalty for violation thereof * * * in such amount,not less than $250 nor more than $2,500, as he deems reasonable.'' TheAdministrator reserves the authority to assess the maximum penalty of $2,500for a violation of any requirement of Part 219. Each day of violation constitutesa separate offense. Section 219.605 sets forth the standards of liabilityapplicable to the various requirements of this part.</F><F>\2\ For purposes of this schedule, an intentional violation is a failureto comply in which the railroad has acted willfully and with actual knowledgeof the facts constituting the violation. Knowledge of the regulations ispresumed by law.]</F></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 217_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 217 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 202 and 209, 84 Stat. 971 and 975 (45 U.S.C.431 and 438), and sec. 1.49(n) of the regulations of the Office of theSecretary of Transportation, 49 CFR 1.49(n).</ITAG>2. Part 217 is amended by amending andSection; 217.13 to add a new paragraph(d)(5) as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 217.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual report.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(4) * * *(5) Number and results of random drug tests conducted under the authorityof andSection; 219.601 of this title. For positive tests indicate the numberfor each controlled substance by drug group, and the following informationby drug group: number and type of disciplinary actions taken, number ofemployees referred for abatement or rehabilitation, number of employeesreferred for abatement/rehabilitation evaluated as requiring rehabilitation,number of employees receiving outpatient rehabilitation exclusively, numberof employees receiving inpatient rehabilitation, number of employees failingto complete abatement and rehabilitation, number of employees who completedabatement or rehabilitation determined after investigation to have beeninvolved in subsequent alcohol/drug disciplinary offenses, and number offollow-up tests and results by drug group. Also indicate the number ofrefusals to cooperate in random testing.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-10323 Filed 5-5-88; 2:00 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-06-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>